North Dakota, session 69, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 54-52-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
3. "Correctional officer" means a participating member who is employed as a correctional officer
by a political subdivision. The term includes an individual employed by a correctional facility as
defined in section 12-44.1-01, who is enrolled in, but has not yet completed, a correctional
officer course approved or certified by the North Dakota department of corrections and
rehabilitation.

H. B. NO. 1177 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1177.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State